Louisiana, session 2026, SB257.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:325.4(B)(4), 333(B)(5), and 406(A)(3)(e) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§325.4. Commercial taking of other saltwater finfish; exceptions; mesh size
* * *
B.(1) * * *
* * *
(4) Each pompano strike net shall have attached to it a tag issued by the
department which states the name, and address, and social security number of the
owner of the net and the permit number of the permit issued to commercially take
black drum (also known as puppy drum), sheepshead, and flounder. The department
shall not issue any tag to a person who does not have a social security number.
* * *
§333. Mullet; saltwater areas
* * *
B.(1) * * *
* * *
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 257 ENROLLED
(5) Each mullet strike net shall have attached to it a tag issued by the
department which states the name, and address, and social security number of the
owner of the net and the permit number of the permit issued to commercially take
mullet. The department shall not issue any tag to a person who does not have a social
security number.
* * *
§406. Use of trammel net, seine, gill net, or webbing prohibited in the waters of
Breton Islands and Chandeleur Islands; exceptions; penalty
A.(1) * * *
* * *
(3)(a) * * *
* * *
(e) Each pompano strike net shall have attached to it a tag issued by the
department which states the name, and address, and social security number of the
owner of the net and the permit number of the permit issued to commercially take
pompano. The department shall not issue any tag to a person who does not have a
social security number.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.